Hawaii statutes.
[§654-3] Execution of the order. The
officer to whom an order has been issued shall forthwith execute the same by
taking possession of the property therein described, for which purpose the
officer may enter in or upon any enclosure or other property, including any
building or other structure, vehicle, vessel, or aircraft, and may, upon denial
of entrance and after exhibiting the officer's authority if requested, use
necessary force to secure entrance; provided that no property shall be so taken
if the court issuing the order is without jurisdiction to execute process at
the place at which the property is found. [L Sp 1949, c 7, pt of §1; RL 1955,
§244-23; HRS §654-24; am L 1972, c 90, §1(c); ren HRS §654-3; gen ch 1985]

Rules of Court

See HRCP rules 64, 69.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next